Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-272
County supervisors; meetings.

The regular meetings of the county board shall be held in January.

Laws 1879, § 64, p. 372;

Laws 1889, c. 6, § 1, p. 76;

R.S.1913, § 1064;

C.S.1922, § 966;

C.S.1929, § 26-280;

R.S.1943, § 23-272;

Laws 1997, LB 40, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 323, § 1.

It would not be presumed that county supervisor-elect qualified until first regular meeting. Kerr v. Adams County, 96 Neb. 178, 147 N.W. 683 (1914).